Vermont, session 2025-2026, H176.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. COMMUNITY RESTITUTION; DEVELOPMENT;
IMPLEMENTATION
(a) On or before July 1, 2025, the Department of Corrections shall
reinstitute the Field Based Community Restitution Program, commonly
VT LEG #380244 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.176
2025 Page 2 of 2
referred to as “work crew,” that was discontinued by the Rescinding
Memorandum issued by the Department, which rescinded Department Policy
#339.01, Court and Reparative Services Unit Operations Directive, dated
March 13, 1995 and Department Policy #392.01, Operation of Field Based
Community Restitution Program, dated July 1, 2021, and was effective on July
1, 2023.
(b) The Department of Corrections may enact policies limiting the number
of days ordered on a single mittimus and how many total work crew days an
offender may have outstanding at any time to be eligible for work crew. The
Department shall set the number of work crew days imposed under a single
mittimus to not less than 20 days or the total number that may be outstanding
on multiple mittimuses to not less than 60 days.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380244 v.1